Utah statutes.
58-41-5.5.   Temporary licenses.

(1) (a)  The division may issue a temporary license to an applicant for an audiology license who:

(i)   has obtained a master's or doctorate degree in audiology prior to July 1, 2010, or a clinical doctorate degree in audiology or AuD, after June 30, 2010; and

(ii)  is practicing audiology in a year of clinical fellowship.

(b)  The temporary license is valid for up to 12 months.

(2) (a)  The division may issue a temporary license to an applicant for a speech-language pathology license who:

(i)  has completed all requirements for licensure as a speech-language pathologist under this chapter, except for Subsection 58-41-5(4)(d); and

(ii)  is practicing speech-language pathology in a year of clinical fellowship.

(b)  The temporary license is valid for up to 12 months.



Enacted by Chapter 397, 2010 General Session

